Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-507
Food
Supply Animal Veterinary Incentive Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Food Supply Animal Veterinary Incentive Fund is created. The fund may be used
to carry out the purposes of the Food Supply Animal Veterinary Incentive Program
Act. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money appropriated to
the fund by the Legislature and any money received as gifts or grants or other
private or public funds received under the act. Any money in the fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 2008, LB1172, § 7.

Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.